Wyoming, session 2025, SF0152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-2-108(a), (b)(viii) and by
creating new paragraphs (ix) through (xi) is amended to
read:
36-2-108. Appointment of state forester;
qualifications; duties.
(a) The state board of land commissioners shall
appoint a state forester who shall be the administrative
head of the Wyoming state forestry division of the office
of state lands and investments. He The state forester shall
serve at the pleasure of the board. He The state forester
shall have a bachelor's degree in forestry with not less
than four (4) years experience in professional forestry
work. The state forester shall, under the general
supervision of the board, have direction of all forest
interest and all matters pertaining to forestry within the
jurisdiction of the state of Wyoming.; and may, with
approval of the board, appoint such assistants and
employees as are necessary in executing the duties of his
office.
(b) The state forester shall:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(viii) Cooperate with federal agencies and all
political subdivisions of the state to fulfill the intent
of this section;.
(ix) Adopt rules as necessary to fulfill the
duties described in this article;
(x) Appoint assistants and employees as are
necessary in executing the duties of the division;
(xi) Maintain wildland and forestry fire control
programs including, but not limited to:
(A) Fire management, coordination and
reimbursement for all lands owned and managed by the state
of Wyoming and its agencies;
(B) Fire management assistance within the
state of Wyoming;
(C) Pre-position suppression equipment,
personnel and other resources during periods of high
wildfire risk;
(D) Support for local fire jurisdiction
training programs;
(E) Establishing standards and regulations
for privately contracted private wildland fire resources
operating in Wyoming. As used in this subparagraph,
"privately contracted private fire resources" includes
services retained by insurers for prevention and
suppression activities on insured properties.
Section 2.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) There is appropriated from the general fund for
the purpose of restoring funds expended by the state of
Wyoming to suppress wildfires that occurred in calendar
year 2024 the following amounts for the following programs
or purposes:
(i) One million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for the
special contingency division of the office of the governor,
unit 0601;
(ii) One million two hundred sixty-three
thousand nine hundred sixty-six dollars ($1,263,966.00) for
the disaster contingency unit within the homeland security
division of the office of the governor, unit 1106;
(iii) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00) to
the emergency fire suppression account within the office of
state lands and investments.
(b) There is appropriated from the general fund up to
twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00), or as much thereof
as is necessary, to be deposited by the state auditor in
the legislative stabilization reserve account for repayment
of funds borrowed on or before June 30, 2025 from the
legislative stabilization reserve account under 2024
Wyoming session laws, chapter 118, section 301(b).
(c) Funds appropriated in this section shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207,
funds appropriated in this section shall not lapse at the
end of any fiscal period. Any unexpended, unobligated funds
at the end of any fiscal period shall remain in the account
to which the funds were appropriated and be expended for
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the purposes specified by this section, except as otherwise
provided by further legislative authorization.
Section 3. For the period beginning July 1, 2025 and
ending June 30, 2026, the governor is authorized to borrow
from the legislative stabilization reserve account up to
thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00) as necessary to
meet funding requirements to fight wildfires in the event
the reserves in the office of state lands and investments'
forestry division have been exhausted. The governor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee, the president
of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives immediately upon exercise of this
authority.
Section 4.
(a) The state loan and investment board is authorized
to make loans under this section from the legislative
stabilization reserve account for the purpose of mitigation
and restoration projects needed as a result of wildfire and
specified disasters that occur within the state of Wyoming.
The aggregate sum of all loans made under this section
shall not exceed one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00). No new loans under this section shall be
made after June 30, 2027.
(b) The office of state lands and investments, under
the direction of the state loan and investment board, shall
establish and administer loans under this section to
qualified persons, including political subdivisions, for
any of the following purposes:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Restoring grass, hay and vegetation
destroyed by wildfire or other natural disasters on state
and private lands;
(ii) Preventing the establishment of nonnative
invasive terrestrial vegetation on private or state lands
affected by wildfire or other natural disasters;
(iii) Replacing private fences destroyed or
partially destroyed by wildfire or other natural disasters;
(iv) Replacing and restoring the habitat and the
resources provided by that habitat destroyed by wildfire or
other natural disasters on state and private land;
(v) Repairing or replacing irrigation facilities
destroyed by wildfire or other natural disasters on state
and private land;
(vi) Repairing or replacing private structures
destroyed by wildfire or other natural disasters;
(vii) Providing funding for any private cost
share required of federal or state funding that would
otherwise qualify under this section;
(viii) Providing monetary assistance to farmers
and ranchers whose real property or assets are damaged by
catastrophic events. As used in this paragraph,
"catastrophic event" means a fire, earthquake, breached dam
or other natural or man-made event to a farming or ranching
operation or to state land that causes monetary damage of
at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) All loan applications under this section shall be
provided to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust
fund board for a recommendation to the state loan and
investment board. All loans shall be subject to final
approval by the state loan and investment board.
(d) The loan program established and administered by
the office of state lands and investments under this
section shall be subject to all of the following:
(i) All applicants for loans shall reasonably
demonstrate that they have applied for insurance payments
for which they are eligible and all reasonably identifiable
and applicable federal and state funding or were not
eligible for other reasonably identifiable and applicable
federal or state funding;
(ii) Loans shall be secured by collateral from
each applicant, which may include land, structures,
equipment and livestock. Collateral required under this
paragraph may be accepted in a subordinate lien position;
(iii) The office shall develop the application
forms, requirements and conditions needed to ensure timely
repayment of loans;
(iv) The office shall impose any other necessary
loan terms;
(v) The maximum term of loans shall not exceed
twenty (20) years;
(vi) The interest rate on all loans shall be two
percent (2%).
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(e) Interest payments received from loans under this
section shall be deposited to the general fund, except that
up to one-half (1/2) of all interest payments may be
retained by the office of state lands and investments and
are continuously appropriated for administration of the
loan program. All principal payments shall be deposited to
the legislative stabilization reserve account.
(f) The office of state lands and investments shall
maintain any records and accounts of revenues and
expenditures in relation to loans under this section as
required by the director of the state department of audit.
Not later than October 15 of each year in which the loan
program is operational, the office shall report to the
joint appropriations committee and the joint agriculture,
state and public lands and water resources interim
committee on the purposes and amount of loans approved
under this section.
Section 5. 2022 Wyoming session laws, chapter 51, as
amended by 2023 Wyoming session laws, chapter 94, and 2024
Wyoming session laws, chapter 118, section 321(f) is
amended to read:
[ENERGY MATCHING FUNDS]
Section 321.
(f) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008,
9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207:,
(i) An amount such that the
sum of the reverted funds under this
subsection combined with any
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
deappropriated funds under the repeal
of 2024 Wyoming session laws, chapter
118, section 323, equals one hundred
fifty-two million two hundred twenty-
nine thousand five hundred sixty-four
dollars ($152,229,564.00), or as much
thereof as is available, shall revert
to the budget reserve account on or
before April 1, 2025; and
(ii) Any unexpended,
unobligated funds from the
appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section remaining after the reversion
of funds in paragraph (i) of this
subsection shall not revert until June
30, 2027.
Section 6. There is appropriated two million seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000.00) from the
general fund to the office of state lands and investments
and there is authorized one (1) full-time employee position
and four (4) part-time employee positions for contract and
direct fire response. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
doubled and included in the office of state lands and
investments' standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.
Section 7. There is appropriated forty-nine million
four hundred seventy-nine thousand five hundred sixty-four
dollars ($49,479,564.00) from the general fund to the
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
These funds are continuously appropriated from the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust income account to the
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board
to provide grants to Wyoming conservation districts, weed
and pest districts and the game and fish commission for
purposes of restoring grass, hay and other vegetation
destroyed by wildfires on private and state lands,
preventing the establishment of nonnative, invasive
terrestrial vegetation on private and state lands affected
by wildfires and replacing and restoring habitats on
private and state lands destroyed by wildfires. This
appropriation shall be expended only for the purposes
specified in this footnote. This appropriation shall not be
subject to the requirements of the Wyoming Wildlife and
Natural Resource Funding Act. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
standard budget of the Wyoming wildlife and natural
resource trust for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.
Section 8.
(a) The appropriations in section 2(a) of this act
shall be reduced in accordance with the following:
(i) The appropriation in section 2(a)(i) of this
act shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every one
dollar ($1.00) appropriated in 2025 Senate File 0001 or
2025 House Bill 0001 for the special contingency division
of the office of the governor, unit 0601, for the purposes
specified in section 2(a) of this act;
(ii) The appropriation in section 2(a)(ii) of
this act shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
one dollar ($1.00) appropriated in 2025 Senate File 0001 or
2025 House Bill 0001 for the disaster contingency unit
within the homeland security division of the office of the
governor, unit 1106, for the purposes specified in section
2(a) of this act;
(iii) The appropriation in section 2(a)(iii) of
this act shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every
one dollar ($1.00) appropriated in 2025 Senate File 0001 or
2025 House Bill 0001 to the emergency fire suppression
account within the office of state lands and investments
for the purposes specified in section 2(a) of this act.
(b) The appropriation in section 2(b) of this act
shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar
($1.00) appropriated in 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025 House
Bill 0001 to the legislative stabilization reserve account
for the repayment of funds borrowed on or before June 30,
2025 from the account under 2024 Wyoming session laws,
chapter 118, section 301(b).
(c) The borrowing authorization provided in section 3
of this act shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for
every one dollar ($1.00) of borrowing authorization
provided in section 301(b) of 2025 Senate File 0001 or
section 301(b) of 2025 House Bill 0001.
Section 9.
(a) 2024 Wyoming session laws, chapter 118, section
301(b) is repealed.
(b) 2024 Wyoming session laws, chapter 118, section
323 is repealed.
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0152
ENROLLED ACT NO. 62, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 10.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(b) Sections 4, 5, 6, 7 and 9(b) of this act shall
not be effective if either 2025 Senate File 0001 or 2025
House Bill 0001 are enacted into law.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
11